Utah statutes.
41-6a-505.   Sentencing requirements for driving under the influence of alcohol, drugs, or a combination of both violations.

(1)  As part of any sentence for a first conviction of Section 41-6a-502:

(a)  the court shall:

(i) (A)  impose a jail sentence of not less than 48 consecutive hours;

(B)  require the person to work in a compensatory-service work program for not less than 48 hours; or

(C)  require the person to participate in home confinement through the use of electronic monitoring in accordance with Section 41-6a-506;

(ii)  order the person to participate in a screening;

(iii)  order the person to participate in an assessment, if it is found appropriate by a screening under Subsection (1)(a)(ii);

(iv)  order the person to participate in an educational series if the court does not order substance abuse treatment as described under Subsection (1)(b);

(v)  impose a fine of not less than $700; and

(vi)  order probation for the person in accordance with Section 41-6a-507, if there is admissible evidence that the person had a blood alcohol level of .16 or higher; and

(b)  the court may:

(i)  order the person to obtain substance abuse treatment if the substance abuse treatment program determines that substance abuse treatment is appropriate; or

(ii)  order probation for the person in accordance with Section 41-6a-507.

(2)  If a person is convicted under Section 41-6a-502 within 10 years of a prior conviction as defined in Subsection 41-6a-501(2):

(a)  the court shall:

(i) (A)  impose a jail sentence of not less than 240 consecutive hours;

(B)  require the person to work in a compensatory-service work program for not less than 240 hours; or

(C)  require the person to participate in home confinement through the use of electronic monitoring in accordance with Section 41-6a-506;

(ii)  order the person to participate in a screening;

(iii)  order the person to participate in an assessment, if it is found appropriate by a screening under Subsection (2)(a)(ii);

(iv)  order the person to participate in an educational series if the court does not order substance abuse treatment as described under Subsection (2)(b);

(v)  impose a fine of not less than $800; and

(vi)  order probation for the person in accordance with Section 41-6a-507; and

(b)  the court may order the person to obtain substance abuse treatment if the substance abuse treatment program determines that substance abuse treatment is appropriate.

(3)  Under Subsection 41-6a-503(2), if the court suspends the execution of a prison sentence and places the defendant on probation:

(a)  the court shall impose:

(i)  a fine of not less than $1,500;

(ii)  a jail sentence of not less than 1,500 hours;

(iii)  supervised probation; and

(iv)  an order requiring the person to obtain a screening and assessment and substance abuse treatment at a substance abuse treatment program providing intensive care or inpatient treatment and long-term closely supervised follow-through after treatment for not less than 240 hours; and

(b)  the court may require the person to participate in home confinement through the use of electronic monitoring in accordance with Section 41-6a-506.

(4) (a)  The requirements of Subsections (1)(a), (2)(a), and (3)(a) may not be suspended.

(b)  Probation or parole resulting from a conviction for a violation under this section may not be terminated.

(5)  If a person is convicted of a violation of Section 41-6a-502 and there is admissible evidence that the person had a blood alcohol level of .16 or higher, the court shall order the following, or describe on record why the order or orders are not appropriate:

(a)  treatment as described under Subsection (1)(b), (2)(b), or (3)(a)(iv); and

(b)  one or both of the following:

(i)  the installation of an ignition interlock system as a condition of probation for the person in accordance with Section 41-6a-518; or

(ii)  the imposition of home confinement through the use of electronic monitoring in accordance with Section 41-6a-506.

